Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.090

Departments to share occupancy costs—Capital projects surcharge.

The director of enterprise services may assess a charge or rent against each state board, commission, agency, office, department, activity, or other occupant or user for payment of a proportionate share of costs for occupancy of buildings, structures, or facilities including but not limited to all costs of acquiring, constructing, operating, and maintaining such buildings, structures, or facilities and the repair, remodeling, or furnishing thereof and for the rendering of any service or the furnishing or providing of any supplies, equipment, historic furnishings, or materials.

The director of enterprise services may recover the full costs including appropriate overhead charges of the foregoing by periodic billings as determined by the director including but not limited to transfers upon accounts and advancements into the enterprise services account. Charges related to the rendering of real estate services under RCW 43.82.010 and to the operation and maintenance of public and historic facilities at the state capitol, as defined in RCW 79.24.710, shall be allocated separately from other charges assessed under this section. Rates shall be established by the director of enterprise services after consultation with the director of financial management. The director of enterprise services may allot, provide, or furnish any of such facilities, structures, services, equipment, supplies, or materials to any other public service type occupant or user at such rates or charges as are equitable and reasonably reflect the actual costs of the services provided: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the legislature, its duly constituted committees, interim committees and other committees shall be exempted from the provisions of this section.

Upon receipt of such bill, each entity, occupant, or user shall cause a warrant or check in the amount thereof to be drawn in favor of the department of enterprise services which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the enterprise services account unless the director of financial management has authorized another method for payment of costs.

Beginning July 1, 1995, the director of enterprise services shall assess a capital projects surcharge upon each agency or other user occupying a facility owned and managed by the department of enterprise services in Thurston county, excluding state capitol public and historic facilities, as defined in RCW 79.24.710. The capital projects surcharge does not apply to agencies or users that agree to pay all future repairs, improvements, and renovations to the buildings they occupy and a proportional share, as determined by the office of financial management, of all other campus repairs, installations, improvements, and renovations that provide a benefit to the buildings they occupy or that have an agreement with the department of enterprise services that contains a charge for a similar purpose, including but not limited to RCW 43.01.091, in an amount greater than the capital projects surcharge. Beginning July 1, 2002, the capital projects surcharge does not apply to department of services for the blind vendors who operate cafeteria services in facilities owned and managed by the department of enterprise services; the department shall consider this space to be a common area for purposes of allocating the capital projects surcharge to other building tenants beginning July 1, 2003. The director, after consultation with the director of financial management, shall adopt differential capital project surcharge rates to reflect the differences in facility type and quality. The initial payment structure for this surcharge shall be one dollar per square foot per year. The surcharge shall increase over time to an amount that when combined with the facilities and service charge equals the market rate for similar types of lease space in the area or equals five dollars per square foot per year, whichever is less. The capital projects surcharge shall be in addition to other charges assessed under this section. Proceeds from the capital projects surcharge shall be deposited into the Thurston county capital facilities account created in RCW 43.19.501.

[ 2015 c 225 s 56; 2005 c 330 s 5; 2002 c 162 s 1; 1998 c 105 s 5; 1994 c 219 s 16; 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 10; 1979 c 151 s 81; 1973 1st ex.s. c 82 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 159 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.01.090. Prior: (i) 1951 c 131 s 1; 1941 c 228 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10964-30. (ii) 1951 c 131 s 1; 1941 c 228 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10964-31.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.

Findings—Purpose—1994 c 219: "The legislature finds that there is inequitable distribution among state programs of capital costs associated with maintaining and rehabilitating state facilities. The legislature finds that there are insufficient available resources to support even minor capital improvements other than debt financing. The legislature further finds that little attention is focused on efficient facility management because in many cases capital costs are not factored into the ongoing process of allocating state resources. The purpose of sections 16 through 18, chapter 219, Laws of 1994 is to create a mechanism to distribute capital costs among the agencies and programs occupying facilities owned and managed by the *department of general administration in Thurston county that will foster increased accountability for facility decisions and more efficient use of the facilities." [ 1994 c 219 s 15.]

*Reviser's note: The department of general administration was renamed the department of enterprise services by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107.

Finding—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.88.030.

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 82: "This 1973 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1973." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 82 s 2.]

Agricultural commodity commissions exempt: RCW 15.04.200.

Enterprise services account: RCW 43.19.500.

Housing for state offices, departments, and institutions: Chapter 43.82 RCW.